Utah statutes.
34A-8a-302.   Evaluation of injured worker -- Reemployment plan.

(1)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, if an injured worker is an injured worker with a disability, the employer or the employer's workers' compensation insurance carrier shall, within 10 days after the day on which the employer or workers' compensation insurance carrier serves the initial written report on the injured worker, refer the injured worker with a disability to:

(a)  the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation; or

(b)  at the employer's or workers' compensation insurance carrier's option, a private rehabilitation or reemployment service.

(2)  An employer or the employer's workers' compensation insurance carrier shall make the referral required by Subsection (1) for the purpose of:

(a)  providing an evaluation; and

(b)  developing a reemployment plan.

(3)  The commission may authorize an employer or the employer's workers' compensation insurance carrier to:

(a)  not make a referral required by Subsection (1); or

(b)  make a referral during a different time period than required by Subsection (1).

